dev/verbs-apertium-kaz-tat.kaz.lexc
LEXICON PRON-DEM-MINA

мына%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>:мына CLIT-GENERAL ;
мына%<prn%>%<dem%>%<gen%>:мынаның CLIT ;
мына%<prn%>%<dem%>%<dat%>:мынаған CLIT ;
мына%<prn%>%<dem%>%<acc%>:мынаны CLIT ;
мына%<prn%>%<dem%>%<abl%>:мынадан CLIT-GENERAL ;
мына%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:мынада CLIT-GENERAL ;
мына%<prn%>%<dem%>%<ins%>:мынамен CLIT ;
!мына%<prn%>%<dem%>%<px%>:мынанікі%{n%} CASE ;
!мына%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:мынадағы ATTR/SUBST ;
мына%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sim%>:мынадай CASE ;
мына%<prn%>%<dem%>%<adv%>:мыналай CLIT-GENERAL ;
мына%<prn%>%<dem%>%<px3sp%>:мынасы%{n%} CASE ;

мына%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>:мыналар CASE-ETC ;
мына%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>%<px3sp%>:мыналары%{n%} CASE ;

LEXICON PRON-DEM-ANA

ана%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>:ана CLIT-GENERAL ;
ана%<prn%>%<dem%>%<gen%>:ананың CLIT ;
ана%<prn%>%<dem%>%<dat%>:анаған CLIT ;
ана%<prn%>%<dem%>%<acc%>:ананы CLIT ;
ана%<prn%>%<dem%>%<abl%>:анадан CLIT-GENERAL ;
ана%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:анада CLIT-GENERAL ;
ана%<prn%>%<dem%>%<ins%>:анамен CLIT ;
!ана%<prn%>%<dem%>%<px%>:ананікі%{n%} CASE ;
!ана%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:анадағы ATTR/SUBST ;
ана%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sim%>:анадай CASE ;
!ана%<prn%>%<dem%>%<adv%>:аналай CLIT-GENERAL ;
!ана%<prn%>%<dem%>%<px3sp%>:анасы%{n%} CASE ;

ана%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>:аналар CASE-ETC ;
ана%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>%<px3sp%>:аналары%{n%} CASE ;

LEXICON PRON-DEM

PRON-DEM-BUL ;
PRON-DEM-MINA ;
PRON-DEM-ANA ;

сол%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>:cол CLIT-GENERAL ;
сол%<prn%>%<dem%>:со PRON-DEM-INFL ;
сол%<prn%>%<dem%>%<ins%>:сонымен CLIT ;
сол%<prn%>%<dem%>%<px3sp%>:сонысы%{n%} CASE ;

ол%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>:ол CLIT ;
ол%<prn%>%<dem%>:о PRON-DEM-INFL ;
ол%<prn%>%<dem%>%<ins%>:онымен CLIT ;
ол%<prn%>%<dem%>%<px3sp%>:онысы%{n%} CASE ;

осы%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>:осы CLIT ;
осы%<prn%>%<dem%>:осы PRON-DEM-INFL ;
осы%<prn%>%<dem%>%<ins%>:осымен CLIT ;
осы%<prn%>%<dem%>%<px3sp%>:осысы%{n%} CASE ;

! FIXME DISCUSS: Since <reas><abl> is a feature only of "ol" and "sol",
! below were going to be lexicalised and added as subordinative
! conjunctions. /IS/
! This is a bad idea though, because -ндықтан affix is a feature of verbs
! as well, so we'll have to consider it a productive derivation anyway /IS/

ол%<prn%>%<dem%>%<reas%>%<abl%>:ондықтан # ; ! "because of that"
сол%<prn%>%<dem%>%<reas%>%<abl%>:сондықтан # ; ! "because of that"


!!!!!!!   I N T E R R O G A T I V E

! Some of the words listed in the grammars I have as interrogative pronouns
! were placed in other root lexicons depending on what POS they substitute or
! act like syntactically. So (as planned for today):
! 1) "неше" is a <num><itg>;
! 2) "қайда, қайдан, қашан, қалай, қалайша" are <adv><itg> (the first three
! should link to a class containing location cases btw, as many current adverbs
! do);
! 3) "қанша" is added both as an interrogative pronoun and as an interrogative
! adverb /IS/
!
! What already added as interrogative pronouns are: кім, ни, нәрсе
! And to be added as interrogative pronouns are: қайсы, қандай, қанша.
! I'd like to mark қандай as <sim> form (with қандай for the upper side though),
! but wouldn't go too deeply into the structure of other two and not derive them
! from "қай" (that's what they have most likely originated from) IS
!
! Of course, "қай", "қайсы" and all other pronouns which can be used as an
! attribute were added as determiners linking to CLIT as well.
! Good idea is to have an rlx rule selecting determiner reading when a word is
! ambiguous between (prn X nom) and (det X) and there is noun to the right;
! and selecting pronoun if there is a verb to the right.

LEXICON PRON-ITG-INFL

%<prn%>%<itg%>: SUBST ;

LEXICON PRON-ITG-QAYSI

қайсы%<prn%>%<itg%>%<nom%>:қайсы CLIT ;
қайсы%<prn%>%<itg%>%<gen%>:қайсының CLIT ;
қайсы%<prn%>%<itg%>%<dat%>:қайсыған CLIT ;
қайсы%<prn%>%<itg%>%<acc%>:қайсыны CLIT ;
қайсы%<prn%>%<itg%>%<abl%>:қайсыдан CLIT ;
қайсы%<prn%>%<itg%>%<loc%>:қайсыда CLIT ;
қайсы%<prn%>%<itg%>%<ins%>:қайсымен CLIT ;

қайсы%<prn%>%<itg%>%<px%>:қайсынікі%{n%} CASE ;
қайсы%<prn%>%<itg%>: POSS-REAL ; ! қайсысы, қайсыбыз, қайсығыз

қайсы%<prn%>%<itg%>%<pl%>:қайсылар CASE-ETC ;
қайсы%<prn%>%<itg%>%<pl%>%<px3sp%>:қайсылары%{n%} CASE ;
! ^ кайсылары(б/г)ыз are rare but possible in Tatar, so maybe these forms should
! be included too /IS/

LEXICON PRON-ITG-QANSHA

! Might be not complete (қаншалар?)
! Currently қанша<prn><itg> is translated with ничә<num><itg><subst> and
! қанша<adv><itg> is going to be translated with "күпме" or "никадәр"

қанша%<prn%>%<itg%>:қанша CASE ;

LEXICON PRON-ITG-QANDAY

! Might be not complete (қандайларығыз? and possessive stuff in general)

қандай%<prn%>%<itg%>%<sim%>:қандай CLIT ;
! ^ FIXME Similative form of demonstrative pronouns should receive an alternati-
! ve continuation with CLIT too. Consider e,g.: "Ең жақсы Интернет қандай?" Here
! it shouldn't receive <nom> tag I think /IS/
қандай%<prn%>%<itg%>%<sim%>:қандай CASE ;
қандай%<prn%>%<itg%>%<sim%>%<px3sp%>:қандайы%{n%} CASE ;
қандай%<prn%>%<itg%>%<sim%>%<pl%>:қандайлар CASE ;
қандай%<prn%>%<itg%>%<sim%>%<pl%>%<px3sp%>:қандайлары%{n%} CASE ;

LEXICON PRON-ITG

PRON-ITG-QAYSI ;
PRON-ITG-QANSHA ;
PRON-ITG-QANDAY ;
нәрсе:нәрсе PRON-ITG-INFL ; ! "thing" ! Use/MT
не:не PRON-ITG-INFL ; ! "what"
кім:кім PRON-ITG-INFL ; ! "who"

LEXICON PRON-QNT

%<prn%>%<qnt%>: N-INFL-COMMON ; ! FIXME: Check contlex

LEXICON PRON-IND

%<prn%>%<ind%>: N-INFL-COMMON ; ! FIXME: Check contlex

LEXICON PRON-IND-POSS

%<prn%>%<ind%>: POSSESSION ;

LEXICON PRNNEG

%<prn%>%<neg%>: CASE ;

LEXICON PRON-RECIP

%<prn%>%<recip%>: POSSESSION ;

LEXICON PRON-REF-ADV

CASE-ETC ;
%<adv%>:ше CLIT ;

LEXICON PRON-REF

! FIXME JNW please have a look at this
! Listing all forms here because of overgeneration with *өздерім,
! *өздеріміз, *өзіңдер etc while linking to POSS-REAL. This was the idea.
! Now they are handled more like personal pronouns (the same tags in the same
! order), so they should pass transfer without any trouble.
!-----
! A remaining problem with reflexive pronoun is that it takes personal copula
! suffixes "selectively": e.g. prn.refl.px1sg would take only cop.px1sg
! (prn.ref.px3sp seems to take all of them though).
! A little bit of overgeneration won't hurt anyone :), but I think that odd
! forms could be filtered out somehow later. Don't know how to do it./04Aug, IS/

! FIXME DISCUSS Write full forms for the lower side and put only PRON-DEF in the
! Root Lexicon

%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}м PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}ң PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>%{S%}%{I%}%{n%} PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}м%{I%}з PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>д%{A%}р%>%{I%}ң PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>д%{A%}р%>%{S%}%{I%}%{n%} PRON-REF-ADV ;

%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<frm%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<frm%>:%>д%{A%}р%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з PRON-REF-ADV ;

! This is how it was before:
!%<prn%>%<ref%>: POSS-REAL ;
!%<prn%>%<ref%>%<pl%>:%{L%}%{A%}р POSS-REAL ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!     DETERMINERS

LEXICON DET-DEM

%<det%>%<dem%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-QNT

%<det%>%<qnt%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-IND

%<det%>%<ind%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-ITG

%<det%>%<itg%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-NEG

%<det%>%<neg%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-REF

%<det%>%<ref%>: # ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!     PART-OF-SPEECH LEXICONS

LEXICON N1

%<n%>%<attr%>: # ;
%<n%>: SUBST ;

LEXICON N-COMPOUND-PX ! consider "N2" for the name
                      ! equiv of kir:LEXICON N-INFL-3PX-COMPOUND

%<n%>:%>%{S%}%{I%}%{n%} CASE-ETC ;
%<n%>: POSS-REAL ;     ! for stuff like "біздің ауа райымыз" and even "оның ауа райы", which should have a <px3sp> analysis

 LEXICON Nouns
аға:аға N1 ; ! "older brother"
адвокат:адвокат N1 ; ! ""
азық%-түлік:азық%-түлік N1 ; ! "groceries"
айна:айна N1 ; ! "mirror"
ақыл:ақыл N1 ; ! "mind"
Алла:алла N1 ; ! "" FIXME:NOTE: no plural
аң:аң  N1 ; ! "beast"
ар:ар N1 ; ! "honour"
арыз:арыз N1 ; ! "petition"
астана:астана N1 ; ! "capital city"
атамекен:атамекен N1 ; ! "homeland"
ауа% райы:ауа% рай N-COMPOUND-PX ; ! "weather,climate"
ауыз:ау%{y%}з N1 ; ! "mouth"   ! Dir/LR  ! FIXME: check that only LR
ашытқы:ашытқы N1 ; ! "leaven"
әже:әже N1 ; ! "grandmother"
әкономика:әкономика N1 ; ! "economy"
әрекет:әрекет N1 ; ! "behaviour"
баға:баға N1 ; ! "price"
бақ:бақ N1 ; ! "garden"
балта:балта N1 ; ! "axe"
баспана:баспана N1 ; ! ""
батыл:батыл N1 ; ! "brave" FIXME adjective
без:без N1 ; ! "gland"
бетеге:бетеге N1 ; ! ""
билік:билік N1 ; ! "~wealth;власть"
болжам:болжам N1 ; ! ""
бөлік:бөлік N1 ; ! "division" FIXME: check
бұғау:бұғау N1 ; ! "iron chains"
бұтақ:бұтақ N1 ; ! "branch"
гүл:гүл N1 ; ! "flower"
ғылым:ғылым N1 ; ! "science"
дастарқан:дастарқан N1 ; ! "table spread"
дәптер:дәптер N1 ; ! "notebook"
декабрь:декабрь N1 ; ! ""
директор:директор N1 ; ! "director"
дос:дос N1 ; ! "friend"
дүние:дүние N1 ; ! "world,possesions"
елбас:елбас N1 ; ! ""
еңбектестік:еңбектестік N1 ; ! ""
ертең:ертең N1 ; ! "tomorrow"          ! FIXME:CHECK: POS
ескерткіш:ескерткіш N1 ; ! "monument,memorial"
жаза:жаза N1 ; ! "punishment,penalty"
жақсылық:жақсылық N1 ; ! ""
жан%-жақ:жан%-жақ N1 ; ! "all sides"
жара:жара N1 ; ! "wound"
жастық:жастық N1 ; ! "pillow,pad"
жезде:жезде N1 ; ! "husband of older sister"
желке:желке N1 ; ! "nape,back of head"
жесір:жесір N1 ; ! "widow"
жік:жік N1 ; ! "joint"
жол:жол N1 ; ! "road"
жүзе:жүзе N1 ; ! "reality"
жүрек:жүрек N1 ; ! "heart"
жұтым:жұтым N1 ; ! "sip,gulp,swallow"
жыр:жыр N1 ; ! "song"
зембил:зембил N1 ; ! "stretcher"
инстиут:инстиут N1 ; ! "institute"
ілгері:ілгері N1 ; ! "forward"
іс:іс N1 ; ! "work"
кафе:кафе N1 ; ! "café"
кебіс:кебіс N1 ; ! "sandal"
келісім:келісім N1 ; ! "agreement"
керемет:керемет N1 ; ! "wonder"
киік:киік N1 ; ! "antelope"
кітап:кітап N1 ; ! "book"
комплекс:комплекс N1 ; ! ""
көк:көк N1 ; ! "sky,heaven,blue"
көңіл:көңіл N1 ; ! "heart,will,desire"
көрсеткіш:көрсеткіш N1 ; ! ""
күбі:күбі N1 ; ! "barrel"
күнтізбе:күнтізбе N1 ; ! "calendar"
қабат:қабат N1 ; ! ""
қадір:қадір N1 ; ! "respect"
қазы:қазы N1 ; ! "judge"
қақпа:қақпа N1 ; ! "gate"
қам:қам N1 ; ! "anxiety"
қарабайыр:қарабайыр N1 ; ! "ordinaryhorse"
қарлығаш:қарлығаш N1 ; ! "swallow"
қарын:қарын N1 ; ! "stomach"
қастық:қастық N1 ; ! "animosity"
қауіп:қауіп N1 ; ! "danger"
қозғалыс:қозғалыс N1 ; ! ""
қонақ:қонақ N1 ; ! "guest"
қоян:қоян N1 ; ! "rabbit"
құқ:құқ N1 ; ! ""
құм:құм N1 ; ! "sand"
құралай:құралай N1 ; ! "wild goat"
құрмет:құрмет N1 ; ! "respect"
қыз% бала:қыз% бала N1 ; ! "maiden"
қымыз:қымыз N1 ; ! "qymyz"
қыстау:қыстау N1 ; ! "winter pasture / village" (see жайлау)
мадақ:мадақ N1 ; ! "praise"
мал:мал N1 ; ! "cattle,goods,lifestock"
маңыз:маңыз N1 ; ! "importance,significance"
мәдениет:мәдениет N1 ; ! "culture"
мәселе:мәселе N1 ; ! "matter,question"
мекеме:мекеме N1 ; ! "institution"
мереке:мереке N1 ; ! "feast"
министрлік:министрлік N1 ; ! "ministry"
мөртабан:мөртабан N1 ; ! "stamp"
мұғалім% әйел:мұғалім% әйел N1 ; ! "teacher (female)"
мұрт:мұрт N1 ; ! "moustache"
мыс:мыс N1 ; ! ""
наразылық:наразылық N1 ; ! "dissatisfaction"
негіз:негіз N1 ; ! "base,foundation"
нұр:нұр N1 ; ! "light,heavenly"
ойыншы:ойыншы N1 ; ! "player"
олигоцен:олигоцен N1 ; ! ""
орамал:орымал N1 ; ! "towel" FIXME CHECK
отряд:отряд N1 ; ! ""
өнім:өнім N1 ; ! "product,produce"
парасат:парасат N1 ; ! "intellect"
пішін:пішін N1 ; ! ""
радио:радио N1 ; ! "radio"
ручка:ручка N1 ; ! "pen"
салық:салық N1 ; ! "tax"
сәлеметтік:сәлеметтік N1 ; ! ""
сенбі:сенбі N1 ; ! "Saturday"
соққы:соққы N1 ; ! "beating"
сум:сум N1 ; ! ""
сұрақ:сұрақ N1 ; ! "question"
табақ:табақ N1 ; ! "plate"
тамыз:тамыз N1 ; ! "August"
тәлерке:тәлерке N1 ; ! "dish"
температура:температура N1 ; ! "temperature"
тиын:тиын N1 ; ! "penny"
торай:торай N1 ; ! "поросенок"
түйе:түйе N1 ; ! "camel" FIXME CHECK
тұлға:тұлға N1 ; ! ""
уақыт:уақыт N1 ; ! "time"
үш:үш N1 ; ! "tip"
ұсыныс:ұсыныс N1 ; ! "offer"
хабарлама:хабарлама N1 ; ! ""
шайтан:шайтан N1 ; ! "devil"
шара:шара N1 ; ! ""
шет:шет N1 ; ! "edge"
шыбақ:шыбақ N1 ; ! "small fish"
ықылық:ықылық N1 ; ! "hiccups"
алд:ал%{д%} N1 ; ! "front"
 LEXICON ProperNouns 
Сауд% Арабиясы:Сауд% Арабия N-COMPOUND-PX ; ! ""
